Florida, session 2026, HB1013.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
47
48 Section 1. Subsections (21) and (22) are added to section
49 400.506, Florida Statutes, to read:
50 400.506 Licensure of nurse registries; requirements;
Page 2 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1013-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1013 2026
51 penalties.—
52 (21)(a) Each nurse registry shall provide standardized
53 written disclosures to clients at intake and annually
54 thereafter. The disclosures must:
55 1. Be presented in at least 14-point bold type.
56 2. Include a signed acknowledgment of receipt by the
57 client or the client's representative; and
58 3. Contain the following information:
59 a. A statement that caregivers referred by the nurse
60 registry are independent contractors and not employees of the
61 nurse registry.
62 b. The nurse registry's insurance status, including the
63 type and amount of liability coverage carried.
64 c. Contact information for filing complaints, including
65 the state hotline and applicable professional licensing boards.
66 d. A clear explanation of the risks associated with
67 patient transport or the operation of lifting equipment, along
68 with documentation of the client's consent or declination for
69 such activities.
70 (b) The agency shall adopt rules to implement this
71 subsection, including standard disclosure templates and
72 acknowledgment forms.
73 (22)(a) A nurse registry may not use the terms "home
74 health," "home healthcare," or "agency" in any business name,
75 advertising, website, or promotional materials.
Page 3 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1013-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1013 2026
76 (b) Each nurse registry must include the phrase "nurse
77 registry" in its licensed business name and display its state
78 license number prominently in all marketing and advertising,
79 including digital platforms.
80 (c) Each nurse registry must display, in a clear and
81 conspicuous manner on its website and in all digital or print
82 marketing materials, the following disclaimer:
83
84 "All caregivers referred by this nurse registry are
85 independent contractors, not employees. By law, the
86 registry has no authority to supervise, manage, or
87 train caregivers and assumes no responsibility for
88 their actions or the services they provide."
89
90 (d) Each nurse registry shall file a current fee schedule
91 with the agency and provide the schedule to clients before
92 initiating services. The fee schedule must clearly disclose all
93 costs and charges in a manner understandable to the general
94 public.
95 (e) The agency may impose administrative sanctions for
96 failure to comply with this subsection.
97 Section 2. Subsections (6) and (7) of section 400.509,
98 Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (11) and (12),
99 respectively, and new subsections (6) through (10) are added to
100 that section, to read:
Page 4 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1013-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1013 2026
101 400.509 Registration of particular service providers
102 exempt from licensure; certificate of registration; regulation
103 of registrants.—
104 (6)(a) A registered companion or homemaker service
105 provider is subject to initial and periodic inspections by the
106 agency to determine compliance with applicable general laws and
107 rules.
108 (b) The agency shall adopt rules establishing the
109 frequency and scope of such inspections, which must occur at
110 least once every 36 months.
111 (c) Inspections must include, but are not limited to,
112 review of service records, client disclosures, background
113 screening documentation, and compliance with marketing
114 standards.
115 (7)(a) A registered companion or homemaker service
116 provider must provide standardized written disclosures to
117 clients upon initiation of services and annually thereafter.
118 (b) The disclosures must:
119 1. Be presented in at least 14-point bold type;
120 2. Include a signed acknowledgment of receipt by the
121 client or the client's representative; and
122 3. Contain all of the following information:
123 a. A statement that services are limited to nonmedical,
124 non–hands-on care.
125 b. The provider's insurance coverage status, including
Page 5 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1013-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1013 2026
126 type and amount of liability coverage.
127 c. Instructions for filing complaints, including the state
128 hotline number.
129 d. An explanation of the provider's scope and limitations,
130 including the prohibition against personal care or medical
131 services.
132 e. A disclosure of whether caregivers are employees or
133 independent contractors.
134 (c) The agency shall adopt rules establishing standard
135 disclosure templates and acknowledgment forms.
136 (8)(a) A companion or homemaker service provider may not
137 use the terms "home health," "home healthcare," "nursing,"
138 "nurse registry," or "agency" in any business name, advertising,
139 website, or promotional materials.
140 (b) A companion or homemaker service provider must include
141 the phrase "companion and homemaker services" in its licensed
142 business name and display its state registration number
143 prominently in all marketing and advertising, including digital
144 platforms.
145 (c) A companion or homemaker service provider must
146 display, in a clear and conspicuous manner on its website and in
147 all digital or print marketing materials, the following
148 disclaimer:
149
150 "This business provides companion and homemaker
Page 6 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1013-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1013 2026
151 services only. Services do not include personal care
152 or any hands-on health care. By law, companion and
153 homemaker service providers may not assist with
154 activities requiring a health care license or
155 certification."
156
157 (d) The agency shall adopt rules to implement this
158 subsection.
159 (9)(a) Companion and homemaker service providers must
160 maintain accurate, chronological service records for each
161 client, including caregiver assignments, incident reports, and
162 acknowledgment of required disclosures.
163 (b) Providers shall document and report to the agency any
164 adverse incidents or complaints as required by rule.
165 (c) The agency shall adopt rules to implement this
166 subsection.
167 (10)(a) The agency shall establish procedures for
168 investigating complaints against companion and homemaker service
169 providers and may conduct unannounced inspections.
170 (b) The agency may impose administrative fines or other
171 sanctions for violations of this subsection or rules adopted
172 thereunder.
173 Section 3. Subsection (10) of section 408.803, Florida
174 Statutes, is amended to read:
175 408.803 Definitions.—As used in this part, the term:
Page 7 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1013-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1013 2026
176 (10) "Low-risk provider" means a nonresidential provider,
177 including a nurse registry, a home medical equipment provider,
178 or a health care clinic.
179 Section 4. Paragraph (h) of subsection (3) of section
180 817.505, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
181 817.505 Patient brokering prohibited; exceptions;
182 penalties.—
183 (3) This section shall not apply to the following payment
184 practices:
185 (h) Commissions or fees paid to a nurse registry licensed
186 under s. 400.506 for referring persons providing health care
187 services to clients of the nurse registry.
188 Section 5. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 8 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1013-00